src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-iiqedw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - īʼedõ: # Verb 57 'eng /est lõigata/fin' - full paradigm
     īʼedõ+V+Inf: [īʼedõ, īedõ]
     īʼedõ+V+Ger: [īʼedõs, īedõs]
     īʼedõ+V+Sup: [īʼedõm, īedõm]
     īʼedõ+V+Sup+Ine: [īʼedõmõs, īedõmõs]
     īʼedõ+V+Sup+Ela: [īʼedõmõst, īedõmõst]
     īʼedõ+V+Sup+Tra: [īʼedõmõks, īedõmõks]
     īʼedõ+V+Sup+Abe: [īʼedõmõt, īedõmõt]
     īʼedõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [īʼedõb, īedõb]
     īʼedõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [īʼedõt, īedõt]
     īʼedõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [īʼedõbõd, īedõbõd]
     īʼedõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [īʼediz, īediz]
     īʼedõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [[īʼedizt, īʼediztõ], [īedizt, īʼediztõ]]
     īʼedõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [[īʼedizt, īʼediztõ], [īedizt, īʼediztõ]]
     īʼedõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: [īʼed, īed]
     īʼedõ+V+Cond+Sg3: [īʼedõks, īedõks]
     īʼedõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: [īʼed, īed]
     īʼedõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: [īʼed, īed]
     īʼedõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: [īʼedõgid, īedõgid]
     īʼedõ+V+Jus+Sg3: [īʼedõg, īedõg]
     īʼedõ+V+Quo+Sg3: [īʼediji, īediji]
     īʼedõ+V+ActPrfPrc: [īʼedõn, īedõn]
     īʼedõ+V+PssPrfPrc: [īʼedtõd, īedtõd]
